Vermont, session 2025-2026, S289.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4255 is amended to read:
§ 4255. LICENSE FEES
(a) Vermont residents may apply for licenses on forms provided by the
Commissioner. Fees for each license shall be:
* * *
(f)(1) On and after July 1, 2026, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall
be reimbursed for lost revenue resulting from:
VT LEG #384937 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.289
2026 Page 2 of 3
(A) the required issuance under statute of free or partially discounted
hunting, fishing, trapping, or combination licenses; and
(B) statutory exemptions under this part to the licensure requirements
for hunting, fishing, or trapping.
(2) The revenue required to be reimbursed under subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be in an amount equal to the amount of the lost revenue from
the free, discounted, or exempted license.
* * *
(n)(1) The Commissioner shall maintain an accounting of the lost revenue
required to be reimbursed to the Department under subsection (f) of this
section due to the issuance of free, discounted, or exempt licenses.
(2) The Commissioner shall submit the accounting of lost revenue
required under this subsection to the Commissioner of Finance and
Management for payment annually on or before June 30 of monies in an
amount equal to the lost revenue from the prior fiscal year. Within 30 days
following receipt of the accounting of lost revenue, the Commissioner of
Finance and Management shall deposit into the Fish and Wildlife Fund the
amount of lost revenue.
(3) Any reimbursement to the Department under this section for lost
license fee revenue shall be made from the General Fund as approved by the
General Assembly.
VT LEG #384937 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.289
2026 Page 3 of 3
(4) The Commissioner annually on or before January 15 shall submit to
the Senate Committees on Appropriations and on Finance and the House
Committees on Appropriations and on Ways and Means an accounting of lost
revenue from the previous calendar year due to the issuance of free licenses.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384937 v.1